North Dakota statutes. TITLE 31 Judicial Proof
CHAPTER 31-10 Judicial Notice

31-10-01.
Evidence of facts judicially noted not required — How judges familiarized with such facts. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P. 26; N.D.R.Ev. 201.

31-10-02.
Facts subject to judicial notice. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P. 26, 26.1; N.D.R.Ev. 201.

31-10-03.
Foreign laws — Those judicially noted — How court familiarized with — Reviewable.

Every court of this state shall take judicial notice of the common law and statutes of every state, territory, and other jurisdiction of the United States. Such court may inform itself of the laws in such manner as it may deem proper and may call upon counsel to aid it in obtaining such information. The determination of such laws shall be made by the court and not by the jury and shall be reviewable.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 196, §§ 1 to 3; R.C. 1943, § 31-1003.

Note.

This section is derived from the Uniform Judicial Notice of Foreign Law Act.

The Uniform Judicial Notice of Foreign Law Act was withdrawn by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws in 1966.

Cross-References.

Determination of foreign law, see N.D.R.Civ.P. 44.1.

Presumption that foreign law is same as domestic law in absence of proof to the contrary, see N.D.C.C. § 31-11-03(39).

Section 40-18-19.

Where judicial notice of a municipal ordinance is required under N.D.C.C. § 40-18-19, it is not necessary that a copy of the ordinance be placed in evidence, although it is essential that the trial court be supplied with the necessary information. City of Mandan v. Mertz, 399 N.W.2d 298, 1987 N.D. LEXIS 236 (N.D. 1987).

31-10-04.
Evidence of foreign laws admissible — Notice to adverse party of reliance on foreign laws.

Any party may also present to the trial court any admissible evidence of the laws in another jurisdiction, but, to enable a party to offer evidence of such laws or to ask that judicial notice be taken thereof, reasonable notice shall be given to the adverse parties either in the pleadings or otherwise.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 196, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 31-1004.

Note.

This section is derived from the Uniform Judicial Notice of Foreign Law Act.

Cross-References.

Pleading official documents or acts, see N.D.R.Civ.P. 9(d).

Statutes, codes, and decisions are admissible as evidence of laws of foreign jurisdictions, see N.D.C.C. § 31-09-01.

31-10-05.
Foreign laws not judicially noted constitute issue for court.

The law of a jurisdiction other than those jurisdictions referred to in section 31-10-03 shall be an issue for the court, but shall not be subject to the provisions concerning judicial notice contained in such section.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 196, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 31-1005.

Note.

This section is derived from the Uniform Judicial Notice of Foreign Law Act.